District of Columbia statutes.
1-606.05

Authority of Council to issue rules mandated by § 1-606.04(a).

The officers of the Council of the District of Columbia may issue rules, subject to approval by the Council of the District of Columbia, concerning review of central staff employee personnel appeals as mandated in § 1-606.04(a).

History

Oct. 24, 1981, D.C. Law 4-48, § 6, 28 DCR 4276
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 31, 35 DCR 147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-606.5.